Hawaii statutes.
§342D-83 Revolving fund; establishment,
purposes, coordination. (a) There is established in the state
treasury a fund to be known as the water pollution control revolving fund to be
administered by the director. The revolving fund shall be administered,
operated, and maintained to remain available in perpetuity for its stated
purpose.

(b) The purpose of the revolving fund is to
provide financial assistance to eligible parties for projects or activities to:

(1) Enable counties and state agencies to plan,
design, and construct publicly owned wastewater treatment works in accordance
with title 33 United States Code sections 1381 to 1387;

(2) Enable eligible parties to implement management
programs established under title 33 United States Code section 1329;

(3) Enable eligible parties to implement conservation
and management plans established under title 33 United States Code section 1330;

(4) Enable eligible parties to construct, repair, or
replace a privately owned decentralized wastewater treatment system and
individual wastewater system that treats municipal wastewater or domestic
sewage under title 33 United States Code section 1383;

(5) Enable eligible nonprofit entities to provide
assistance to small and medium sized publicly owned treatment works for
training activities, planning, design, and associated preconstruction
activities under title 33 United States Code section 1383;

(6) Enable eligible parties to manage, reduce, treat,
or recapture stormwater or subsurface drainage water under title 33 United
States Code section 1383;

(7) Enable eligible parties to develop and implement
watershed projects meeting the criteria under title 33 United States Code
section 1274;

(8) Enable counties and state agencies to reduce the
demand for publicly owned treatment works capacity through water conservation,
efficiency, or reuse under title 33 United States Code section 1383;

(9) Enable counties and state agencies to reduce the
energy consumption needs for publicly owned treatment works under title 33 United
States Code section 1383;

(10) Enable eligible parties to reuse or recycle
wastewater, stormwater, or subsurface drainage water under title 33 United
States Code section 1383; and

(11) Enable eligible parties to increase the security
of publicly owned treatment works under title 33 United States Code section
1383. [L 1997, c 221, pt of §1; am L 2002, c 132, §6; am L 2016, c 240, §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next